Hawaii, session 2025, GM1332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 571-87, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows:
" (b) The court shall determine the amount of reasonable
compensation paid to appointed counsel and [guardian] guardians
ad litem, based on the following rates:
(1) [$90] $150 an hour for in-court or out-of-court
services provided by an attorney licensed to practice
law in the State; and
(2) [449-] $122 an hour for [-h
-LAF e^—ee«'^?t^-9e¥v4-eee—pr^vTded—by—an—
-l-icGnsod-to practice law in the State;—anb
■(B-)- Aiij all services provided by a person who is not
an attorney licensed to practice law in the
State, whether performed in-court or
out-of-court.
(c) The maximum allowable fee shall not exceed the
following schedule:
2025-3299 HB398 CDl HMSO
IliitiLilfflIEHILTiffl]

Page 2
H.B. NO. S-i
C.D. 1
(1) Cases arising under chapters —aftd] 346,
part X [-r] , and 587A:
(A) Predisposition ..........................
$5, 500; and
(B) Postdisposition review hearing ..........
[-$47-0^] $2,000; and
(2) Cases arising under chapters 560, 571, 580, and
584 .........................................
[$-3-y000. ] $5,500.
Payments in excess of any maximum provided for under
paragraphs (1) and (2) may be made whenever the court in which
the representation was rendered certifies, based upon
representations of extraordinary circumstances, attested to by
the applicant, that the amount of the excess payment is
necessary to provide fair compensation in light of those
circumstances, and the payment is approved by the administrative
judge of that court."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3299 HB398 CDl HMSO

398
H.B. NO
I
CO
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 398, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 398, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate